apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="anglez__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ësh</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ët</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ët</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eje</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eje</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esh</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="logjik__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ësh</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>un</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ut</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ut</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ët</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ët</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eje</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eje</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esh</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="agresiv"><i>agresiv</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akademik"><i>akademik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktor"><i>aktor</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ambasador"><i>ambasador</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ambicioz"><i>ambicioz</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="argëtues"><i>argëtues</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arkeologjik"><i>arkeologjik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arsimor"><i>arsimor</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artificial"><i>artificial</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artistik"><i>artistik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atlantik"><i>atlantik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atomik"><i>atomik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="austriak"><i>austriak</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="automatik"><i>automatik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autonom"><i>autonom</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bashkëkohor"><i>bashkëkohor</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bashkiak"><i>bashkiak</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biometrik"><i>biometrik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bregdetar"><i>bregdetar</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="celular"><i>celular</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çlirimtar"><i>çlirimtar</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="danez"><i>danez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delikat"><i>delikat</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demografik"><i>demografik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demokrat"><i>demokrat</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="disiplinor"><i>disiplinor</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dramatik"><i>dramatik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekologjik"><i>ekologjik</i><par n="logjik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="logjik"><i>logjik</i><par n="logjik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekskluziv"><i>ekskluziv</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstrem"><i>ekstrem</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekzakt"><i>ekzakt</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekzekutiv"><i>ekzekutiv</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektoral"><i>elektoral</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektronik"><i>elektronik</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emergjent"><i>emergjent</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="analist"><i>analist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anglez"><i>anglez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstremist"><i>ekstremist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="humanist"><i>humanist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komunist"><i>komunist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionalist"><i>nacionalist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="optimist"><i>optimist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="profesionist"><i>profesionist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="qytetar"><i>qytetar</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="racist"><i>racist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radikal"><i>radikal</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="realist"><i>realist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rebel"><i>rebel</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reformist"><i>reformist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="separatist"><i>separatist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="socialist"><i>socialist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terrorist"><i>terrorist</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="danez"><i>danez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estonez"><i>estonez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finlandez"><i>finlandez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="francez"><i>francez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hollandez"><i>hollandez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hungarez"><i>hungarez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="irlandez"><i>irlandez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="japonez"><i>japonez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jordanez"><i>jordanez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanadez"><i>kanadez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kinez"><i>kinez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="malazez"><i>malazez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="norvegjez"><i>norvegjez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="palestinez"><i>palestinez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portugez"><i>portugez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="suedez"><i>suedez</i><par n="anglez__n"/></e>
